Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 8 Local Option
3-8-313. Indictment.

(a)

In an indictment for a violation of any provision of this act or for a violation of any act amendatory hereof, it shall not be necessary to allege that a vote was taken or any election held, or any other step relative thereto.

(b)

It may be simply stated that the act or acts charged were committed in a territory where this act was in force, and in the indictment it shall be sufficient to designate this act as the local option law.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14152; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-812.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-314. Bond for multiple violations.

(a)

On the second or any subsequent conviction for a violation of this act or any of its amendments, the court shall require the defendant to execute bond in the sum of two hundred dollars ($200) to be of good behavior for the period of twelve (12) months.

(b)

The court may, in its discretion, increase the amount of the bond. If the bond is not given, the defendant shall be committed to the county jail for a period not exceeding ninety (90) days, to be fixed by the court.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14152; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-812.

Publisher's Notes.

Section 3-3-103 also requires bonds for multiple offenses.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-315. C.O.D. shipments.

(a)

All the shipments of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors to be paid for on delivery, commonly called “C.O.D. shipments”, into any county, city, town, district, or precinct where this act is in force shall be unlawful and shall be deemed sales of such liquors at the place where the money is paid or the goods delivered.

(b)

The carrier and his or her agents selling or delivering such goods shall be liable jointly with the vendor thereof.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14152; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-812.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-316. Act given in charge to grand jury.

It shall be the duty of the judges of the circuit courts to give this act in charge to the grand juries of the counties within their jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 14160; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-819.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

3-8-317. Wholesale of intoxicating liquor in prohibited territory.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful to sell by wholesale any spirituous, vinous, malt, or other intoxicating liquor, regardless of the name by which it is called, except manufacturers selling liquor of their own make at the place of manufacture to a wholesale dealer or a licensed retail dealer, in any county, city, town, district, or precinct where the sale of liquor has been prohibited by vote of the people under the local option law.

(2)(A)

A licensed wholesaler may maintain an alcoholic beverage storage facility in a county, city, town, district, or precinct where the sale of liquor has been prohibited when the storage facility is located in the same county as the wholesaler's licensed distributorship.

(B)

A storage facility permitted under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section is subject to inspection and approval of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(b)

Any person violating this act shall be deemed guilty of violating the local option law and shall be subject to trial and punishment according to the provisions of the local option law and its amendments.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 7, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 14154; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-814; Acts 2013, No. 305, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (a)(2).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §3-8-301.

Subchapter 4

— Beer and Light Wine

3-8-401. Beer and light wine.

(a)

At each general election for state and county offices, there may be submitted to the qualified electors of any county in the State of Arkansas so desiring, in the manner provided for the submission in a county of the question under the initiative and referendum provisions of the Constitution and laws of the State of Arkansas, the question as to whether the sale of beer and light wine containing alcohol not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight shall or shall not be permitted within the county for two (2) years in case the matter is voted on at a general election.

(b)

In voting upon the question, the electors shall have printed or written upon their ballot, “FOR the sale of beer and light wines” or “AGAINST the sale of beer and light wines”.

(c)

The election shall be held at the same time and place and in the same manner as other elections. All returns shall be canvassed, sealed, and forwarded by the officers of the election to the county board of election commissioners of the county voting thereon.

(d)

The board shall canvass the votes and certify the results thereof to the clerk of the circuit court of the county to be by him or her filed in his or her office, which certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the legal or illegal sale of beer and light wine in the county.

(e)

Each and every county voting against the sale of beer and light wine shall not participate in any revenue for school purposes levied and collected under §3-5-205 during the time the county or counties prohibited the sale of the beer and light wine.

(f)

The expense of the election shall be borne by the petitioners calling the election.

History.

Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 27-A; Pope's Dig., § 14220; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-518.

Publisher's Notes.

This section originally applied to beer and light wines of an alcoholic content not in excess of 3.2% by weight. Pursuant to §3-1-103, this section was made to apply to malt and vinous beverages having an alcoholic content of not more than 5% by weight.

Subchapter 5

— Petition for Local Option Elections

3-8-501. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Dry” means that the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of intoxicating liquors is unlawful in a prescribed area;

(2)

“Intoxicating liquors” means all beverages containing more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight; and

(3)

“Wet” means that the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of intoxicating liquors is lawful in a prescribed area.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1258, § 1.

3-8-502. Local option elections in certain annexed areas.

(a)(1)(A)

If an area meets the qualifications provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the residents of the area may petition the county clerk of the county for a local option election to determine whether off-premises retail beer permits and off-premises Arkansas native wine retail permits shall be issued within the annexed area.

(B)

An area qualifies to hold a local option election under this subchapter if:

(i)

The area has been annexed from a dry township into a wet contiguous and adjoining city or incorporated town;

(ii)

The annexed area is separated from the remainder of the dry township by a four-lane divided highway; and

(iii)

A nonbinding election was held between November 1, 2004, and January 1, 2005, in the annexed area on the issue of whether intoxicating liquors may be manufactured, sold, bartered, loaned, or given away within the annexed area.

(2)

The petition requesting a local option election shall be prepared in the manner provided by §3-8-205.

(3)(A)

When thirty-eight percent (38%) of the qualified electors of the annexed area, as shown on county voter registration records, sign a petition requesting a local option election, the county clerk shall determine the sufficiency of the petition within ten (10) days of the filing of the petition.

(B)

If the county clerk verifies that thirty-eight percent (38%) of the qualified electors of the annexed area have signed the petition, the county clerk shall certify that finding to the county board of election commissioners.

(C)

The question shall be placed upon the ballot in the annexed area at the next biennial November general election, as provided in §3-8-101.

(D)

Any appeal of the order of the county court shall be taken in the manner provided by §3-8-205(c)-(e).

(4)(A)

The election shall be conducted in the manner provided by §3-8-206(a) and (b).

(B)

Upon petition of fifteen percent (15%) of the interested legal voters in the annexed area, within ten (10) days after the date of the election, the county board of election commissioners shall immediately recount the votes and declare the result of the election as determined by the recount.

(C)

Within twenty (20) days after the election, the county court shall make and enter of record its order declaring the result of the election.

(D)

The costs of any elections held under this subchapter shall be paid by the county in the same manner as other costs of general elections.

(5)

Upon petition of fifteen percent (15%) of the interested legal voters in the annexed area filed with the circuit clerk of the county in which proceedings are pending, the circuit court shall immediately by mandamus compel the county court or other officials to perform the duties imposed upon them under this section.

(b)(1)

If, at the local option election, a majority of the electors of the annexed area vote for the issuance of off-premises retail beer permits and off-premises Arkansas native wine retail permits within the annexed area, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue off-premises retail beer permits and off-premises Arkansas native wine retail permits within the annexed area.

(2)

If a majority of the electors of the annexed area vote against the issuance of off-premises retail beer permits and off-premises Arkansas native wine retail permits, it shall be unlawful for the director or any county or municipal officer to issue any off-premises retail beer permit or off-premises Arkansas native wine retail permit until the prohibition shall be repealed by a majority vote as provided in this section.

(3)

At least four (4) years shall elapse before another local option election may be held in the annexed area.

(c)

Except as provided in this section, a petition for local option election shall be governed by §7-9-101 et seq. and §3-8-801 et seq.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1258, § 1; 2013, No. 1432, §§ 5, 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “3-8-205” for “3-8-204” in (a)(2); and added (c).

Subchapter 6

— Local Option Elections

Effective Dates.

Acts 2013, No. 1018, § 2: Apr. 9, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the ability of a territorial subdivision located in a defunct voting district to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages would improve the economic status of local businesses. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-8-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Beer” means a fermented liquor made from malt or a malt substitute and containing not more than five percent (5%) alcohol by weight;

(2)

“Defunct voting district” means a voting district that:

(A)

Existed at the time its qualified voters voted to be dry;

(B)

Is no longer recognized by the state or the county in which it was located; and

(C)

Is currently located in a wet county;

(3)

“Dry” means a county or territorial subdivision that voted to prohibit the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, as amended, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, or §3-8-302 [repealed], §
3-8-303, §
3-8-304 [repealed], §
3-8-305, and §
3-8-306;

(4)

“Malt beverage” means a liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of not less than five percent (5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight;

(5)

“Spirituous liquor” means a liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables and containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight or any other liquids containing more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight;

(6)

“Territorial subdivision” means a township, municipality, ward, or precinct of a county of the state;

(7)

“Vinous beverage” means the fermented juices of fruits or a mixture containing the fermented juices of fruits containing more than five percent (5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight;

(8)

“Voting district” means a geographical area of qualified voters of a county in this state; and

(9)

“Wet” means a county or territorial subdivision that voted to permit the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, as amended, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, or §3-8-302 [repealed], §
3-8-303, §
3-8-304 [repealed], §
3-8-305, and §
3-8-306.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1018, §
1.

3-8-602. Local option election — Defunct voting district — On-premises consumption only.

(a)(1)

Under subsection (b) of this section, an area within the boundaries of a defunct voting district may conduct an election to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages identified in subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

(2)

The sale of alcoholic beverages under this section shall be limited to beer, malt beverages, vinous beverages, and spirituous liquor for on-premises consumption within the corporate limits of a city of the first class or a city of the second class.

(b)

An election for an area within the boundaries of a defunct voting district to permit the sale of the alcoholic beverages identified in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be held as follows:

(1)(A)

A registered voter who resides in a county that contains a defunct voting district may request in writing or a city council of a city of the first class that includes a defunct voting district may request by ordinance that the county board of election commissioners issue a resolution to identify the boundaries of a territorial subdivision located in a defunct voting district in which qualified voters may reside.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners shall issue a resolution within thirty (30) days.

(C)

The resolution shall identify the:

(i)

Territorial subdivisions that are located wholly or partially within borders of any defunct voting districts in the county;

(ii)

Formal and informal name or designation of any defunct voting districts in the county as of the last date the defunct voting district held the election resulting in its dry status;

(iii)

Date on which any defunct voting district held the last local option election that resulted in the defunct voting district's becoming dry; and

(iv)

(a)

Boundaries of any defunct voting district at the time of the last local option election that resulted in the defunct voting district's becoming dry.

(b)

The boundaries of the defunct voting district shall be based on state, county, or municipal records or other records publicly identified in the resolution.

(D)

The resolution shall include a map of the boundaries of the defunct voting district from which qualified electors residing within the defunct voting district can be identified and verified for purposes of obtaining signatures and conducting the local option election.

(E)

In preparing the resolution and the map, the county board of election commissioners may consult with the county clerk, the State Board of Election Commissioners, the Secretary of State, or any other entity able to provide assistance in confirming the data and preparing the map required by subdivision (b)(1)(D) of this section and the precise boundaries of the defunct voting district.

(F)

The resolution shall be filed with the county clerk and published one (1) time a week for two (2) weeks as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county;

(2)(A)(i)

A petition procedure for a local option election for a defunct voting district shall be conducted under §3-8-201 et seq.

(ii)

The city council of a city of the first class that includes a defunct voting district may adopt an ordinance to hold a local option election to be conducted under §3-8-201 et seq.

(B)

Signatures shall be obtained from fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified electors residing within the boundaries of a defunct voting district, as identified by the resolution and corresponding map.

(C)

When fifteen percent (15%) of the qualified voters have filed petitions with the county clerk under this subdivision (b)(2), the county clerk shall determine within ten (10) days the sufficiency of the petitions under §3-8-205;

(3)(A)(i)

The election process for a special local option election for a defunct voting district shall be conducted pursuant to §3-8-201 et seq.

(ii)

The county clerk shall issue a resolution calling for a special local option election for a defunct voting district for which the requisite number of signatures has been certified under subdivision (b)(2) of this section when:

(a)

The requisite number of qualified electors sign petitions filed with the county clerk; and

(b)

The county clerk certifies those signatures to the county board of election commissioners.

(iii)

The resolution calling the special local option election shall be filed with the county clerk, and the county clerk shall immediately transmit the document to the county board of election commissioners.

(iv)

The resolution calling the special local option election shall state:

(a)

The date of the special election;

(b)

The full text of the measure for which the election is called; and

(c)

The ballot title for the measure for which the special local option election is called.

(v)

The county board of election commissioners shall publish the resolution calling the special local option election one (1) time a week for two (2) weeks as soon as practicable in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(B)

The ballot title shall be in substantially the following form: “TO DETERMINE WHETHER OR NOT ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES MAY BE SOLD AS AUTHORIZED BY ARKANSAS CODE §3-8-602 WITHIN (popular name of the defunct voting district)”.

(C)

The ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

“[ ] FOR the Sale of Alcoholic Beverages, As Authorized by Arkansas Code §3-8-602.

[ ] AGAINST the Sale of Alcoholic Beverages, As Authorized by Arkansas Code §3-8-602.”.

(D)

The special local option election shall be called on a Tuesday and shall not be held less than sixty (60) days following the date the resolution calling the special election is filed with the county clerk.

(E)

The map of the defunct voting district created by the county board of election commissioners shall be placed at each polling site.

(F)

A majority vote of the qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the defunct voting district shall determine whether or not alcoholic beverages may be sold or manufactured under subdivision (a)(2) of this section within the boundaries of the defunct voting district; and

(4)

The precincts and polling sites to be utilized for conducting elections under this section shall be established by the county board of election commissioners.

(c)

If a defunct voting district is located entirely within the boundaries of a larger defunct voting district, a vote shall be held only for the larger defunct voting district.

(d)(1)

If two (2) defunct voting districts overlap, then the overlapping area will only be included in the boundaries of the defunct voting district that first held the local option election that resulted in its dry status to determine whether or not alcoholic beverages may be sold or manufactured under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

(2)(A)

The local option elections for more than one (1) defunct voting district may be held simultaneously or on different dates.

(B)

If local option elections for more than one (1) defunct voting district are held on the same date, the majority vote of all the voters residing within the boundaries of the defunct voting district shall determine the local option status of only the geographic area located within the boundaries of that particular defunct voting district.

(e)

If the majority of the qualified voters in the special local option election vote:

(1)

For the sale of alcoholic beverages as described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, then it shall be lawful for the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to issue the relevant licenses or permits within the defunct voting district immediately after the certification of the results of an election permitting the sale or manufacture of alcoholic beverages under this section, as required by §3-8-206; or

(2)

Against the sale or manufacture of alcoholic beverages as described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, then it shall be unlawful for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to issue licenses or permits for the sale of alcoholic beverages within the defunct voting district.

(f)

A subsequent election under this section shall not be held in the same defunct voting district until a period of two (2) years has elapsed since the last special local option election conducted under this section.

(g)

The cost of a local option election under this section shall be paid by the county in the same manner as the cost of a general election, or in any other manner as properly determined by the quorum court.

(h)(1)

The boundaries of a defunct voting district as identified by the county board of election commissioners under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be deemed final and valid unless clearly erroneous or arbitrary.

(2)

Any challenge to or appeal of the boundaries established by the resolution of the county board of election commissioners shall be made to the county court within eleven (11) days of the first publication of the resolution described in subdivision (b)(1)(F) of this section.

(i)

To the extent any of the provisions of this section conflict with §3-8-201 et seq., the provisions of this section control.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1018, §
1; 2015, No. 564, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 144, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted “manufacture and” preceding “sale” in (a)(1) and the introductory language of (b); rewrote (a)(2); substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (b)(2)(A); rewrote (b)(2)(B) and added (b)(2)(C); deleted “OR MANUFACTURED” following “MAY BE SOLD” in (b)(3)(B); and deleted “or manufacture” following “sale” near the beginning of (e)(1) and following the second occurrence of “sale” in (e)(2).

The 2017 amendment inserted “or a city council of a city of the first class that includes a defunct voting district may request by ordinance” in (b)(1)(A); added (b)(2)(A)(ii); and substituted “the sale of alcoholic beverages” for “such sale” in (e)(2).

Subchapter 7

— Disclosure Act for Initiative Proceedings

3-8-701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Disclosure Act for Initiative Proceedings”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)(A)

“Contribution” means, whether direct or indirect, advances, deposits, transfers of funds, contracts, or obligations, whether or not legally enforceable, payments, gifts, subscriptions, assessments, payments for services, dues, advancements, forbearance, loans, pledges, or promises of money or anything of value, whether or not legally enforceable, to a person for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(B)

“Contribution” includes the purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events and the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all persons for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(C)

“Contribution” does not include:

(i)

Noncompensated, nonreimbursed volunteer personal services or travel;

(ii)

Activities designed solely to encourage individuals to vote or to register to vote; or

(iii)

Any communication by a bona fide church or religious denomination to its own members or adherents for the sole purpose of protecting the right to practice the religious tenets of the church or religious denomination;

(2)

“Disqualification of a local-option ballot question” means any action or process, legal or otherwise, that seeks to prevent a local-option ballot question from being on the ballot at an election;

(3)

“Elected official” means any person holding an elective office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office;

(4)(A)

“Expenditure” means a purchase, payment, distribution, gift, loan, or advance of money or anything of value, and a contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure for goods, services, materials, or facilities for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(B)

“Expenditure” does not include an expenditure made for communication by a person strictly with the person's paid members or shareholders;

(5)

“Governmental body” means any office, department, commission, council, board, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state, municipality, county, school district, improvement district, or any political district or subdivision thereof;

(6)

“Local-option ballot question” means a question in the form of a local-option initiative that is submitted or intended to be submitted to a popular vote at an election, whether or not it qualifies for the ballot;

(7)(A)

“Local-option ballot question committee” means any person, located within or outside Arkansas, that receives contributions for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question or any person, other than an elected official expending public funds, or an individual, located within or outside Arkansas, that makes expenditures for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(B)

A person other than an individual or an approved political action committee as defined in §7-6-201, located within or outside Arkansas, also qualifies as a local-option ballot question committee if two percent (2%) or more of the committee's annual revenues, operating expenses, or funds are used to make a contribution or contributions to another ballot question committee and if the contribution or contributions exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value;

(8)(A)

“Person” means any individual, business, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, business trust, labor organization, company, corporation, association, committee, or any other organization or group of persons acting in concert.

(B)

“Person” includes a public servant or governmental body using public funds to expressly advocate the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question; and

(9)

“Qualification of a local-option ballot question” means any action or process, legal or otherwise, through which a local-option ballot question obtains certification to be on the ballot at an election.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2015, No. 226, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted present (3) and redesignated former (3) as (4); inserted (5) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “an elected official” for “a public servant, a governmental body” in (7)(A).

3-8-703. Filing deadlines.

(a)(1)(A)

A local-option ballot question committee shall file a Local-Option Ballot Question Committee Statement of Organization with the Arkansas Ethics Commission within five (5) days of receiving contributions or making expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(B)

The commission shall maintain the statement of organization until notified of the committee's dissolution.

(2)

A local-option ballot question committee failing to file a statement of organization required by this section shall be subject to a late filing fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day the statement remains not filed.

(b)

The statement of organization for a local-option ballot question committee as defined in §3-8-702(7)(A) shall include the following information:

(1)(A)

The name, the street address, and if available, the telephone number of the committee.

(B)

A committee address and telephone number may be that of the residence of an officer or a director of the committee;

(2)

The name, street address, and if available, the telephone number of the treasurer and other principal officers and directors of the committee;

(3)

The name and address of each financial institution in which the committee deposits money or anything else of monetary value;

(4)

The name of each person who is a member of the committee. A person that is not an individual may be listed by its name without also listing its own members, if any; and

(5)

A brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question, the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence or of each legislative question, the passage or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence, and if known, the date each ballot or legislative question shall be presented to a popular vote at an election.

(c)

The statement of organization for a local-option ballot question committee as defined in §3-8-702(7)(B) shall include the following information:

(1)(A)

The name, the street address, and if available, the telephone number of the committee.

(B)

A committee's address and telephone number may be that of the residence of an officer or a director of the committee;

(2)

The name, street address, and where available, the telephone number of the treasurer and the other principal officers and directors of the committee;

(3)

The name and address of each financial institution in which the committee deposits money or anything else of monetary value;

(4)

The name of each person who is a member of the committee. A person that is not an individual may be listed by its name without also listing its own members, if any; and

(5)

A brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question, the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence, and if known, the date each ballot or legislative question shall be presented to a popular vote at an election.

(d)

Rules regarding dissolution shall be governed by the rule of the commission.

(e)(1)

Upon dissolution, a local-option ballot question committee shall notify the commission of the dissolution in writing.

(2)

Any remaining funds on hand at the time of dissolution shall be turned over to:

(A)

The Treasurer of State for the benefit of the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund;

(B)

An organized political party as defined in §7-1-101 or a political party caucus of the General Assembly, the Senate, or the House of Representatives;

(C)

A nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3);

(D)

Cities of the first class, cities of the second class, or incorporated towns; or

(E)

The contributors to the local-option ballot question committee.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2015, No. 226, § 2; 2017, No. 721, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (d).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), inserted “Local-Option” and “disqualification”; rewrote (b); and inserted (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

3-8-704. Contributions and expenditures limited.

(a)

No local-option ballot question committee shall accept any contribution in cash, meaning currency or coin, that exceeds one hundred dollars ($100).

(b)

No local-option ballot question committee shall accept any contribution from a prohibited political action committee as defined in §7-6-201.

(c)

No local-option ballot question committee or individual shall make an expenditure in cash that exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00) to influence the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question.

(d)

No contributions shall be made, directly or indirectly, by any person in a name other than the name by which the person is identified for legal purposes.

(e)(1)

No person shall make an anonymous contribution totaling fifty dollars ($50.00) or more to a local-option ballot question committee.

(2)

Any anonymous contribution actually received by a local-option ballot question committee shall be promptly paid by the recipient to the Secretary of State for deposit into the State Treasury as general revenues.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7.

3-8-705. Financial reports — Requirement.

(a)

A local-option ballot question committee that either receives contributions or makes expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question shall file with the Arkansas Ethics Commission a Ballot Question Committee Financial Report as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(b)

An individual person who on his or her own behalf expends in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), excluding contributions, for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question shall file with the commission financial reports as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(c)

An elected official expending public funds in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a local-option ballot question shall file with the commission financial reports as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a report required by this subchapter shall be deemed timely filed if it is:

(1)

Hand-delivered to the commission on or before the date due;

(2)

Mailed to the commission, properly addressed, postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on or before the date due;

(3)

Received via facsimile by the commission on or before the date due, provided that the original is received by the commission within ten (10) days of the transmission; or

(4)

Received by the commission in a readable electronic format that is approved by the commission.

(e)

Whenever a report under this subchapter becomes due on a day that is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the report shall be due the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(f)

A preelection report is timely filed if it is received by the commission no later than seven (7) days prior to the election for which it is filed.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1432, §
7; 2015, No. 226, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted present (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “An elected official” for “A public servant or governmental body” in (c).